Connecticut, session 2026, HB05198.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the general statutes be amended to disregard the value of life
insurance policies in eligibility determinations for public assistance
programs, including, but not limited to, Medicaid, to the extent
permissible under federal law.